Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BROOKLYN PARK; WATER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the city of Brooklyn Park for a grant to predesign, design, construct, acquire right-of-way and easements, and equip improvements to the city's water distribution system including two water mains that will connect from the east to west under marked U.S. Highway 169 north of marked Trunk Highway 610, one water main that will connect from the north to south under marked Trunk Highway 610 west of marked U.S. Highway 169, and supporting connections between the new crossings to support the city's biotech innovation district. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end